dev/testp.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóúABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÁÉÍÓÚ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="deg"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="hpref"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="slender"/>
    <sdef n="sub"/>
    <sdef n="com"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="aut"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="op"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="cop"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ecl"/>
    <sdef n="strong"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="ifs"/>
    <sdef n="cop"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="dep"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="weak"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="len"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="defart"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="chuig__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuige</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuigesean</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuige-sean</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuige-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuige-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuici</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuicise</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuici-se</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuici-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuici-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chucu</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chucusan</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chucu-san</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chucu-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chucu-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugat</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugatsa</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugat-sa</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugat-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugat-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugainn</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugainne</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugaibh</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugaibhse</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugaibh-se</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugaibh-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugaibh-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugam</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugamsa</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugam-sa</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugam-seo</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chugam-sin</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>chuig</l><r><a/>chuig<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chuig</l><r>chuig<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="chuig" a="irishfst"><i/><par n="chuig__pr"/></e>
